Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-3208
Prohibited acts.

An appraisal management company that applies to the board for a registration to do business in this state as an appraisal management company shall not:

(1) Knowingly employ any individual to perform appraisal services who has had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser in this state or in any other state refused, denied, canceled, surrendered in lieu of revocation, or revoked;

(2) Knowingly enter into any independent contractor arrangement to perform appraisal services, whether in verbal, written, or other form, with any individual who has had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser in this state or in any other state refused, denied, canceled, surrendered in lieu of revocation, or revoked; or

(3) Knowingly prohibit an appraiser from including within the body of a report that is submitted by the appraiser to the appraisal management company or its assignee the fee that the appraiser was paid by the appraisal management company for the performance of the report.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 74.
August 30, 2015